Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-27,234
Limitations on requirements and liabilities of financial institution.

(1) A financial institution is not required to:

(a) Designate an account as a first-time home buyer savings account, or designate the qualified beneficiaries of an account, in the financial institution's account contracts or systems or in any other way;

(b) Track the use of money withdrawn from a first-time home buyer savings account; or

(c) Report any information to the department or any other governmental agency that is not otherwise required by law.

(2) A financial institution is not responsible or liable for:

(a) Determining or ensuring that an account holder is eligible for a subtraction under subsection (27) of section 77-2716;

(b) Determining or ensuring that money in the account is used for an eligible expense; or

(c) Reporting or remitting taxes or penalties related to the use of money in a first-time home buyer savings account.

(3) In implementing the First-Time Home Buyer Savings Account Act, the department shall not establish any administrative, reporting, or other requirements on financial institutions that are outside the scope of normal account procedures.

Laws 2026, LB803, § 7.
July 18, 2026